Connecticut, session 2026, SB00432.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (h) of section 17b-261 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(h) To the extent permissible under federal law, an institutionalized
individual, as defined in Section 1917 of the Social Security Act, 42 USC
1396p(h)(3), shall not be determined ineligible for Medicaid solely on
the basis of the cash value of a life insurance policy. [worth less than ten
thousand dollars provided the individual is pursuing the surrender of
the policy.]
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 17b-191 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) To be eligible for cash assistance under the program, a person shall
LCO No. 1644 1 of 5

Raised Bill No. 432
(1) be (A) eighteen years of age or older; (B) a minor found by a court to
be emancipated pursuant to section 46b-150; or (C) under eighteen years
of age and the commissioner determines good cause for such person's
eligibility, and (2) not have assets exceeding five hundred dollars or, if
such person is married, such person and his or her spouse shall not have
assets exceeding one thousand dollars. In determining eligibility, the
commissioner shall disregard from income (A) all United States
Department of Veterans Affairs-administered non-service-connected
pension benefits, Aid and Attendance pension benefits and
Housebound pension benefits that are granted to a veteran, as defined
in section 27-103, or the surviving spouse of such veteran; [and] (B) any
tax refund or advance payment with respect to a refundable credit to
the same extent such refund or advance payment would be disregarded
under 26 USC 6409 in any federal program or state or local program
financed in whole or in part with federal funds; and (C) the cash value
of a life insurance policy. No person who is a substance abuser and
refuses or fails to enter available, appropriate treatment shall be eligible
for cash assistance under the program until such person enters
treatment. No person whose benefits from the temporary family
assistance program have terminated as a result of time-limited benefits
or for failure to comply with a program requirement shall be eligible for
cash assistance under the program.
Sec. 3. Subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 17b-112 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) (1) Under said program, no family shall be eligible that has total
gross earnings exceeding the federal poverty level, however, in the
calculation of the benefit amount for eligible families and previously
eligible families that become ineligible temporarily because of receipt of
workers' compensation benefits by a family member who subsequently
returns to work immediately after the period of receipt of such benefits,
earned income shall be disregarded up to the federal poverty level.
When calculating the earnings of a family with income from self-
LCO No. 1644 2 of 5

Raised Bill No. 432
employment, the commissioner shall apply a standard deduction
equivalent to fifty-one per cent of the total monthly income derived
from such self-employment, provided the family verifies at least one
allowable expense directly related to earning such income. A family
may instead deduct all allowable monthly expenses directly related to
the self-employment earnings if such expenses are verified and, in the
aggregate, exceed the amount of the standard deduction. On and after
October 1, 2023, the commissioner shall not deny a family assistance
under said program on the basis of such family's assets unless such
assets exceed six thousand dollars. To the extent permissible under
federal law governing the program, the commissioner shall disregard
the cash value of a life insurance policy when calculating a family's
assets. Except when determining eligibility for a six-month extension of
benefits pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the commissioner
shall disregard the first fifty dollars per month of income attributable to
current child support that a family receives in determining eligibility
and benefit levels for temporary family assistance. Any current child
support in excess of fifty dollars per month collected by the department
on behalf of an eligible child shall be considered in determining
eligibility but shall not be considered when calculating benefits and
shall be taken as reimbursement for assistance paid under this section,
except that when the current child support collected exceeds the family's
monthly award of temporary family assistance benefits plus fifty
dollars, the current child support shall be paid to the family and shall be
considered when calculating benefits.
Sec. 4. Section 17b-91 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The commissioner shall exclude, in the determination of eligibility
for the state supplement program and the temporary family assistance
program, burial funds in an amount not to exceed the maximum amount
provided in section 17b-84. Such funds may be in the form of funeral
service contracts as described in section 42-200, irrevocable funeral
service contracts or the face value of life insurance policies if the cash
LCO No. 1644 3 of 5

Raised Bill No. 432
surrender value is excluded through the irrevocable transfer of the
ownership of the policy to a trust, or any combination thereof, not to
exceed the maximum amount provided in said section 17b-84.
(b) The commissioner shall exclude, in the determination of eligibility
for the state supplement program and for the temporary family
assistance program, the value of a burial plot not to exceed one exclusion
per individual.
(c) The commissioner shall exclude from consideration as an asset, in
the determination of eligibility for the state supplement program and
for the temporary family assistance program, (1) the value of an
irrevocable funeral contract except that the value of such contract shall
be considered towards the amount excluded in subsection (a) of this
section, and (2) the cash value of a life insurance policy not subject to the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the commissioner from
excluding from consideration as an asset in the determination of
eligibility for the state supplement program, or the temporary family
assistance program other personal or real property as he determines is
necessary for the effective administration of such programs.
(e) Where federal law or regulations governing the state supplement
100 program, the temporary family assistance program, or the medical
101 assistance program conflict with the provisions of this section, such law
102 or regulations shall prevail.
103 (f) The exclusion for the burial fund amount in subsection (a) of this
104 section, the exclusion for the burial plot value in subsection (b) of this
105 section and the exclusion for the irrevocable funeral contract value and
106 cash value of a life insurance policy in subsection (c) of this section shall
107 be applied by the commissioner uniformly throughout the state. For
108 purposes of this section, "burial plot" means a purchase of a grave site,
109 opening and closing of a grave site, cremation urn, casket, outer burial
110 container and a headstone or marker.
LCO No. 1644 4 of 5

Raised Bill No. 432
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-261(h)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 17b-191(c)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 17b-112(d)(1)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 17b-91